District of Columbia statutes.
2-407

Repealed

Damage to personal property of District employee incident to service.

Repealed.

Aug. 31, 1964, Pub. L. 88-558, § 3(f)
Oct. 12, 1968, 82 Stat. 998, Pub. L. 90-561
Sept. 13, 1982, 96 Stat. 877, Pub. L. 97-258, § 5(b)
District of Columbia administration, status of volunteers, see § 1-319.03.
1981 Ed., § 1-1207.
1973 Ed., § 1-907.